California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(2) Allocate and pay to the county an amount equal to the total amount of additional revenues generated by the rate levied pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution applied to the increased assessments under this chapter, less the amount determined pursuant to paragraph (1), the remainder multiplied by the county’s property tax apportionment factor determined pursuant to Section 96.2.

(3) Allocate and pay to each county superintendent of schools and community college district within the county an amount equal to the total amount of additional revenues generated by the rate levied pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution applied to the increased assessments under this chapter, less the amount determined
 pursuant to paragraph (1), the remainder multiplied by each county superintendent of schools’ and community college district’s property tax apportionment factor determined pursuant to Section 96.2.

(4) Allocate and pay to each city within the county an amount equal to the total amount of additional revenues generated by the rate levied pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution applied to the increased assessments under this chapter, less the amount determined pursuant to paragraph (1), the remainder multiplied by each city’s property tax apportionment factor determined pursuant to Section 96.2.

(5) Allocate and pay to each special district within the county an amount equal to the total amount of additional revenues generated by the rate levied pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution applied to the increased assessments under this chapter, less the amount determined pursuant to paragraph (1), the remainder multiplied by each special district’s property tax apportionment factor determined pursuant to Section 96.2. The amount allocated to each special district which is governed by the board of supervisors of a county or whose governing body is the same as the board of supervisors of a county, shall be subject to Section 98.6.

(6) Allocate and pay the remaining revenues generated by the rate levied pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution applied to the increased assessments under
 this chapter to all elementary, high school, and unified school districts within the county in proportion to each school district’s average daily attendance, as certified by the Superintendent of Public Instruction for the purposes of the advance apportionment of state aid in the then current fiscal year.

(7) Allocate and pay additional revenues generated by a rate levied in excess of the limitation prescribed by subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution to the fund or funds for which the tax rate or rates were levied.

These allocations and payments shall be made on a timely basis but no later than 30 calendar days after the close of the preceding monthly or four-weekly accounting period. For a county with a population of 500,000 or less, the allocations may be made on a biannual basis.

(d) For purposes of the certification made by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (c), the average daily attendance of the following school districts shall be deemed to be zero:

(1) In the case of multicounty school districts, the portions of the school districts located other than in the county of control.

(2) A school district that is an excess tax school entity, as defined in subdivision (n) of Section 95, in the prior fiscal year.

(e) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall certify the appropriate counts of average daily attendance pursuant to subdivision (a) to each county auditor no later than July 15 of each applicable fiscal year.

(f) If the average daily attendance of all elementary, high school, and unified school districts within the county is deemed to be zero by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to subdivision (d), the county auditor shall reallocate the revenues described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) to the entities listed in paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (c), in proportion to each entity’s percentage of revenues in comparison to the aggregate total of revenues.

(g) On or before November 15 and April 15, the auditor of each county shall furnish to the Superintendent of Public Instruction the estimated amount of tax receipts pursuant to this section of each school district situated within his or her county.

(h) In the event property tax revenues under this chapter are generated by a change in ownership or completed new construction which occurred
 on or before May 31, 1984, but are collected subsequent to the 1983–84 fiscal year, the revenues for the current roll shall be allocated to school districts as if they had been collected and allocated during this 1983–84 fiscal year. Any of the aforementioned revenues which are collected in the 1984–85 fiscal year shall be applied to school apportionments for the 1984–85 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 28, Sec. 88.   (SB 854)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

75.71.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the amounts allocated pursuant to this chapter to a special district, other than a special district governed by a county board of supervisors or whose governing board is the same as the county board of supervisors, shall not be reduced pursuant to Section 98.6 and shall be disbursed directly to the district by the county auditor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 448, Sec. 2.   Effective July 16, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

75.72.

Any penalties, costs, or other charges resulting from delinquency of supplemental taxes shall be distributed pursuant to Part 8 (commencing with Section 4651).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 118.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Effective Date [75.80. - 75.80.]

75.80.

This chapter shall apply to changes in ownership occurring, and new construction completed, on or after July 1, 1983.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1102, Sec. 17.5.   Effective September 27, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Assessment Appeals [80. - 82.]

80.

(a) An application for reduction in the base-year value of an assessment on the current local roll may be filed during the regular filing period for that year as set forth in Section 1603 or Section 1840, subject to the following limitations:

(1) The base-year value determined by a local board of equalization or by the State Board of Equalization, originally or on remand by a court, or by a court shall be conclusively presumed to be the base-year value for any 1975 assessment which was appealed.

(2) The base-year value determined pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 110.1 shall be conclusively presumed to be the base-year value unless an equalization application is filed no later than the regular filing period following the 1980 lien date. Once an application is filed, the base-year value determined pursuant to that application shall be conclusively presumed to be the base-year value for that assessment.

(3) The base-year value determined pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 110.1 shall be conclusively presumed to be the base-year value, unless an application for equalization is filed during the regular equalization period for the year in which the assessment is placed on the assessment roll or in any of the three succeeding years. Once an application is filed, the base-year value determined pursuant to that application shall be conclusively presumed to be the base-year value for that assessment.

(4) The base-year value determined pursuant to Section 51.5 shall be conclusively presumed to be the base-year value unless an application for equalization is filed during the appropriate equalization period for the year in which the error is corrected or in any of the three succeeding years. Once an application is filed, the base-year value determined pursuant to that application shall be conclusively presumed to be the base-year value for that assessment.

(5) Any reduction in assessment made as the result of an appeal under this section shall apply for the assessment year in which the appeal is taken and prospectively thereafter.

(b) This section does not prohibit the filing of an application for appeal where a new value was placed on the roll pursuant to Section 51.

(c) An application for equalization made pursuant to Section 620 or Section 1605 when determined, shall be conclusively presumed to be the base-year value in the same manner as provided herein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 537, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

81.

Where real property has been assessed using a base value other than the 1975 base value, the applicant in equalization proceedings pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1601) of Part 3 may establish the correct base year value applicable to the current year’s assessment, subject to the limitations of Section 80.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 242.)
-------------------------------------------

82.

An application for reduction in the value of new construction that is in progress on the lien date on the current roll may be filed during the regular filing period for that year as set forth in Section 1603 or 1840. An application for reduction in the base year value determined upon completion of new construction may be filed during the regular equalization period for the year in which the assessment is placed on the assessment roll or in any of the three succeeding years, as provided in Section 80.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 80, Sec. 3.   (AB 652)   Effective July 21, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Taxpayer Reporting [90. - 90.]

90.

Assessees shall report change in ownership information to the assessor as provided in Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 480) of Chapter 3 of Part 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 242.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. Property Tax Rates [93. - 93.]

93.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), no local agency, school district, county superintendent of schools, or community college district shall levy an ad valorem property tax, other than that amount which is equal to the amount needed to make annual payments for the interest and principal on general obligation bonds or other indebtedness approved by the voters prior to July 1, 1978 or the amount levied pursuant to Part 10 (commencing with Section 15000) of Division 1 and Sections 39308, 39311, 81338, and 81341 of the Education Code. In determining the tax rate required for the purposes specified in this subdivision, the amount of the levy shall be increased to compensate for any allocation and payment of tax revenues required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 33670 and subdivision (d) of Section 33675 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) A county shall levy an ad valorem property tax on taxable assessed value at a rate equal to four dollars ($4) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value, and at an equivalent rate when the ratio prescribed in Section 401 is changed from 25 percent to 100 percent. The revenue from that tax shall be distributed, subject to the allocation and payment as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 33675 of the Health and Safety Code, to local agencies, school districts, county superintendents of schools, and community college districts in accordance with the provisions of the Government Code through the 1978–79 fiscal year and in accordance with applicable provisions of the Revenue and Taxation Code in each fiscal year thereafter. Revenues from property tax delinquency penalties, and accrued legal interest paid on judgments for the recovery of unpaid property taxes rendered by courts of this state, shall be distributed pursuant to Sections 4653.6, 4655.4, and 4658.4 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or their successors.

(c) Any jurisdiction may levy an ad valorem property tax rate in the excess of the rate permitted in subdivision (b) in order to produce revenues in an amount which is equal to the amount needed to make annual payments for the interest and principal on any bonded indebtedness for the acquisition or improvement of real property which is approved by a two-thirds vote of its voters after June 4, 1986.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1230, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Allocation of Property Tax Revenue [95. - 100.96.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions and Administration [95. - 95.60.]

95.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Local agency” means a city, county, and special district.

(b) (1) (A) “Jurisdiction” means a local agency, school district, community college district, or county superintendent of schools.

(B) A jurisdiction as defined in this subdivision is a “district” for purposes of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution.

(2) For jurisdictions located in more than one county, the county auditor of each county in which that jurisdiction is located shall, for the purposes of computing the
 amount for that jurisdiction pursuant to this chapter, treat the portion of the jurisdiction located within that county as a separate jurisdiction.

(c) “Property tax revenue” includes the amount of state reimbursement for the homeowners’ exemption. “Property tax revenue” does not include the amount of property tax levied for the purpose of making payments for the interest and principal on either of the following:

(1) General obligation bonds or other indebtedness approved by the voters prior to July 1, 1978, including tax rates levied pursuant to Part 10 (commencing with Section 15000) of Division 1 of, and Sections 39308 and 39311 and former Sections 81338 and 81341 of the Education Code, and Section 26912.7 of the Government Code.

(2) Bonded indebtedness for the acquisition or improvement of real property approved
 by two-thirds of the voters on or after June 4, 1986.

(d) “Taxable assessed value” means total assessed value minus all exemptions other than the homeowners’ and business inventory exemptions.

(e) (1) “Jurisdictional change” includes any change of organization, as defined in Section 56021 of the Government Code and a reorganization, as defined in Section 56073 of the Government Code. “Jurisdictional change” also includes any change in the boundary of those special districts that are not under the jurisdiction of a local agency formation commission.

(2) “Jurisdictional change” also includes a functional consolidation where two or more local agencies, except two or more counties, exchange or otherwise reassign functions and any change in the boundaries of a school district or community college
 district or county superintendent of schools.

(f) “School entities” means school districts, community college districts, the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund, and county superintendents of schools.

(g) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, “tax rate area” means a specific geographic area all of which is within the jurisdiction of the same combination of local agencies and school entities for the current fiscal year.

(2) In the case of a jurisdictional change pursuant to Section 99, the area subject to the change shall constitute a new tax rate area, except that if the area subject to change is within the same combinations of local agencies and school entities as an existing tax rate area, the two tax rate areas may be combined into one tax rate area.

(3) Existing tax rate areas having the same combinations of local agencies and school entities may be combined into one tax rate area. For the combination of existing tax rate areas, the factors used to allocate the annual tax increment pursuant to Section 98 shall be determined by calculating a weighted average of the annual tax increment factors used in the tax rate areas being combined.

(h) “State assistance payments” means:

(1) For counties, amounts determined pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 16260 of the Government Code, increased by the amount specified for each county pursuant to Section 94 of Chapter 282 of the Statutes of 1979, with the resultant sum reduced by an amount derived by the calculation made pursuant to Section 16713 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) For cities, 82.91 percent of the amounts determined pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (i) of Section 16250 of the Government Code, plus for any city an additional amount equal to one-half of the amount of any outstanding debt as of June 30, 1978, for “museums” as shown in the Controller’s “Annual Report of Financial Transactions of Cities for Fiscal Year 1977–78.”

(3) For special districts, 95.24 percent of the amounts received pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16270) of Part 1.5 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 35.5 of Chapter 332 of the Statutes of 1978, and Chapter 12 of the Statutes of 1979.

(i) “City clerk” means the clerk of the governing body of a city or city and county.

(j) “Executive officer” means the
 executive officer of a local agency formation commission.

(k) “City” means any city whether general law or charter, except a city and county.

(l) “County” means any chartered or general law county. “County” includes a city and county.

(m) “Special district” means any agency of the state for the local performance of governmental or proprietary functions within limited boundaries. “Special district” includes a county service area, a maintenance district or area, an improvement district or improvement zone, or any other zone or area, formed for the purpose of designating an area within which a property tax rate will be levied to pay for a service or improvement benefiting that area. “Special district” includes the Bay Area Air Quality Management District. “Special district” does not include a city, a county, a school
 district, or a community college district. “Special district” does not include any agency that is not authorized by statute to levy a property tax rate. However, any special district authorized to levy a property tax by the statute under which the district was formed shall be considered a special district. Additionally, a county free library established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 19100) of Chapter 6 of Part 11 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code, and for which a property tax was levied in the 1977–78 fiscal year, shall be considered a special district.

(n) “Excess tax school entity” means an educational agency for which the amount of the state funding entitlement determined under subdivision (e), (f), or (g) of Section 2575, or Section 84750.4, 84750.5, or 84751 of the Education Code, as appropriate, is zero, and as described in subdivision (o) of Section 42238.02 of the Education Code, as implemented by Section
 42238.03 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 62.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

95.2.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 1990–91 fiscal year, for the purposes of the computations required by Section 96.1 or its predecessor section, the amount of property tax presumed to have been received by the county in the prior year shall be increased by the amount of 1989–90 property tax administrative costs proportionately attributable to incorporated cities as determined pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) The auditor shall
 determine the 1989–90 fiscal year property tax administrative costs proportionately attributable to incorporated cities by adding the 1989–90 fiscal year property tax-related costs of the assessor, tax collector, and auditor, including applicable administrative overhead costs as permitted by federal Office of Management and Budget Circular A-87 standards, and multiplying the sum of those amounts by the ratio of property tax revenue received by all incorporated cities divided by the total property tax revenue for all local jurisdictions in the county for that fiscal year.

(3) The county shall use the additional revenue received pursuant to this subdivision only to fund the actual costs of assessing, collecting, and allocating property taxes. At least once each fiscal year, the county auditor shall report the amount of these actual costs and allowable overhead costs to the legislative body and any other jurisdiction or person that requests the
 information. To the extent that actual costs for assessing, collecting, and allocating property taxes plus allowable overhead costs are less than the amount determined pursuant to paragraph (2), the county auditor shall apportion the difference to each incorporated city as otherwise required by this section.

(4) The county may retain up to one-half of any increased property tax allocation to which a jurisdiction may be otherwise entitled, until the county receives its additional revenues pursuant to this subdivision.

(5) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this subdivision to recognize that since the approval of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution by the voters, county governments have borne an unfair and disproportionate part of the financial burden of assessing, collecting, and allocating property tax revenues for cities. It is
 further the intent of the Legislature that the adjustments provided for by this subdivision shall constitute charges by a county for the assessment, collection, and allocation of property taxes and shall not exceed the actual costs reasonably borne by a county for those activities.

(b) If so directed by the board of supervisors, the auditor shall determine the 1989–90 fiscal year property tax administrative costs proportionately attributable to local jurisdictions other than the county or city and county, and cities, by adding the property tax-related costs of the assessor, tax collector, and auditor, including applicable administrative overhead costs as permitted by federal Office of Management and Budget Circular A-87 standards, and multiplying the sum of those amounts by the ratio of property tax revenue received by jurisdictions other than the county, city and county, and cities, divided by the total property tax received by all local
 jurisdictions in the county for that fiscal year. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this amount may be calculated for each fiscal year commencing with the 1989–90 fiscal year, and the auditor shall, commencing in the 1990–91 fiscal year, if so directed by the board of supervisors, submit an invoice to these jurisdictions for services rendered in the prior fiscal year.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), no invoice as described in that subdivision shall be submitted to any school district, community college district, or county office of education, nor shall any of those entities be required to pay any invoice, for property tax administrative costs for services rendered in the 1990–91 fiscal year, or in any subsequent fiscal year. This subdivision shall not be construed to prevent the auditor of any county from collecting from school districts, community college districts, and county offices of education, in accordance with subdivision
 (b), property tax administrative costs for services rendered to those entities in the 1989–90 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 607.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

95.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 1990–91 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the auditor shall divide the sum of the amounts calculated with respect to each jurisdiction, Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund (ERAF), or community redevelopment agency pursuant to Sections 96.1 and 100, or their predecessor sections, and Section 33670 of the Health and Safety Code, by the countywide total of those calculated amounts. The resulting ratio shall be known as the “administrative cost apportionment factor” and shall be
 multiplied by the sum of the property tax administrative costs incurred in the immediately preceding fiscal year by the assessor, tax collector, county board of equalization and assessment appeals boards, and auditor to determine the fiscal year property tax administrative costs proportionately attributable to each jurisdiction, ERAF, or community redevelopment agency. For purposes of this paragraph, property tax administrative costs shall also include applicable administrative overhead costs allowed by the federal Office of Management and Budget Circular A-87 standards, but shall not include any amount reimbursed pursuant to Section 75.60 and former Section 98.6, or include any amount in excess of the amounts reimbursable pursuant to Section 75.60, unless a county meets the conditions of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 75.60. However, no amount of funds appropriated to counties for purposes of property tax administration in Item 9100-102-001 of the Budget Act of 1994 or any subsequent Budget Act
 shall result in any deduction from those property tax administrative costs that are eligible for reimbursement pursuant to this subdivision.

(b) (1) Each proportionate share of property tax administrative costs determined pursuant to subdivision (a), except for those proportionate shares determined with respect to a school entity or ERAF, shall be deducted from the property tax revenue allocation of the relevant jurisdiction or community redevelopment agency, and shall be added to the property tax revenue allocation of the county. For purposes of applying this paragraph for the 1990–91 fiscal year, each proportionate share of property tax administrative costs shall be deducted from those amounts allocated to the relevant jurisdiction or community redevelopment agency after January 1, 1991.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the portion of those
 shares of property tax administrative costs that are calculated by the auditor for each fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (a) for school entities and the county’s ERAF, that is attributable to the county’s costs in providing boards and hearing officers for the review of property tax assessment appeals, be calculated by local officials and reimbursed by the state in the time and manner specified by a future act of the Legislature that makes an appropriation for purposes of that reimbursement.

(c) Reductions made pursuant to this section to property tax revenue allocations shall be made without regard to Section 907 of the Government Code.

(d) Any additional amounts of property tax revenue allocated to the county pursuant to this section shall be used only to fund costs incurred by the county in assessing, equalizing, and collecting property taxes, and in allocating property tax
 revenues, and shall constitute charges for those services, not exceeding the actual and reasonable costs incurred by the county in performing those services.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to recognize that since the adoption of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution by the voters, county governments have borne an unfair and disproportionate part of the financial burden of assessing, collecting, and allocating property tax revenues for other jurisdictions and for redevelopment agencies. The Legislature finds and declares that this section is intended to fairly apportion the burden of collecting property tax revenues and is not a reallocation of property tax revenue shares or a transfer of any financial or program responsibility.

(f) Commencing with the 1992–93 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, this section
 shall supersede and replace Section 95.2, as authority for a county to recover property tax administrative costs.

(g) This section shall apply to the entire 1993–94 fiscal year, regardless of the operative date of the act adding the predecessor to this section, and to each fiscal year thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1073, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

95.31.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any eligible county may, upon the recommendation of the county assessor, and by resolution of the board of supervisors of that county adopted not later than December 1 of the fiscal year for which it is to first apply, elect to participate in the State-County Property Tax Administration Loan Program.

(2) Except as specified in paragraph (3), for the purposes of this section, an eligible county shall mean a
 county in which additional property tax revenue allocated to school entities would reduce the amount of General Fund moneys apportioned to school entities. However, eligibility shall be terminated when, in combination with resources in the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund, additional property tax revenues allocated to school entities will not result in a reduction in the General Fund apportionments.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), both the County of Solano and the County of San Benito shall be deemed eligible counties that may, upon the recommendation of the county assessor, and by resolution of the board of supervisors of the county adopted on or before March 31, 1996, elect to participate in the State-County Property Tax Administration Loan Program.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), any county in which a new assessor is elected in 1998 may, upon the recommendation of
 the county assessor, and by resolution of the board of supervisors of the county adopted on or before January 31, 1999, elect to participate in the State-County Property Tax Administration Loan Program commencing with the 1998–99 fiscal year.

(b) (1) In each fiscal year from the 1995–96 fiscal year to the 2001–02 fiscal year, inclusive, an eligible county participating in the State-County Property Tax Administration Loan Program may receive a loan for up to the amount listed in paragraph (3). The loan shall be repaid by June 30 of the fiscal year following the year in which the loan is made. However, at the discretion of the Director of Finance, the loan may be renewed once for an additional 12-month period at the request of the participating county board of supervisors. For the Counties of Fresno, Orange, San Benito, and Solano any loan agreement signed on or before July 31, 1996, shall be deemed a loan agreement for the
 1995–96 fiscal year for the purposes of this section. For any county in which a new assessor is elected in 1998, any loan agreement signed on or before January 31, 1999, shall be deemed a loan agreement for the 1998–99 fiscal year for the purposes of this section.

(2) If an eligible county elects to participate in the State-County Property Tax Administration Loan Program, it shall enter into a contractual agreement with the Department of Finance. At a minimum, the contractual agreement shall include the following:

(A) The loan amount, as determined by the Director of Finance.

(B) Repayment provisions, including the interception of Motor Vehicle License Fee Account moneys apportioned pursuant to Section 11005 to repay the General Fund.

(C) A listing of
 the proposed use of the additional resources including, but not limited to:

(i) Proposed new positions.

(ii) Increased automation costs.

(D) An agreement to provide to the Department of Finance, by March 31 of the fiscal year in which the loan is made, a report projecting the impact of the increased funding in the current and subsequent fiscal year.

(3) Upon request of the Department of Finance, the Controller shall provide a loan to the following counties for up to the amount specified by the Director of Finance, not to exceed the following amounts:JurisdictionAmount Alameda $ 2,152,429Alpine 3,124Amador 80,865Butte 381,956Calaveras 109,897Colusa 53,957Contra Costa 2,022,088Del Norte 36,203El Dorado 302,795Fresno 1,165,249Glenn 59,197Humboldt 210,806Imperial 231,673Inyo 100,080Kern 1,211,318Kings 138,653Lake 117,376Lassen 54,699Los Angeles 13,451,670Madera 212,991Marin 790,490Mariposa 46,476Mendocino 160,435Merced 298,004Modoc 24,022Mono 47,778Monterey 795,819Napa 366,020Nevada 234,292Orange 6,826,325Placer 628,047Plumas 80,606Riverside 2,358,068Sacramento 1,554,245San Benito 90,408San Bernardino 2,139,938San Diego 5,413,943San Francisco 1,013,332San Joaquin 818,686San Luis
 Obispo 736,288San Mateo 2,220,001Santa Barbara 926,817Santa Clara 4,213,639Santa Cruz 565,328Shasta 342,399Sierra 7,383Siskiyou 91,164Solano 469,207Sonoma 1,035,049Stanislaus 866,155Sutter 147,436Tehama 97,222Trinity 24,913Tulare 501,907Tuolumne 126,067Ventura 1,477,789Yolo 278,309Yuba 88,968(4) The Department of Finance shall consider any or all of the following items in determining the extent to which a county has satisfied the terms and repaid the loan, pursuant to the contract, as offered under this part:

(A) County performance as indicated by the State Board of Equalization’s sample survey required pursuant to Section 15640 of the Government Code.

(B) Performance measures adopted by the California Assessors’ Association.

(C) Reduction of backlog of assessment appeals and Proposition 8 declines in value.

(D) County compliance with
 mandatory audits required by Section 469.

(E) Reduction of backlogs in new construction, changes in ownership, and supplemental roll.

(F) Other measures, as determined by the Director of Finance.

(5) The Director of Finance shall notify the Controller of any participating county that fails to comply with the terms of the agreement, including the repayment of the loan. When the Controller receives notice from the Director of Finance, the Controller shall make an apportionment to the General Fund on behalf of the participating county in the amount of that required payment for the purpose of making that payment. The Controller shall make that payment only from moneys credited to the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the Transportation Tax Fund to which the participating county is entitled at that time under Chapter 5
 (commencing with Section 11001) of Part 5 of Division 2, and shall thereupon reduce, by the amount of the payment, the subsequent allocation or allocations to which the county would otherwise be entitled under that chapter.

(c) (1) Funds appropriated for purposes of this section shall be used to enhance the property tax administration system by providing supplemental resources. Amounts provided to any county as a loan pursuant to this section shall not be used to supplant the current level of funding. In order to participate in the State-County Property Tax Administration Loan Program, a participating county shall maintain a base staffing, including contract staff, and total funding level in the county assessor’s office, independent of the loan proceeds provided pursuant to this act, equal to the levels in the 1994–95 fiscal year exclusive of amounts provided to the assessor’s office pursuant to Item 9100-102-001 of the
 Budget Act of 1994. However, in a county in which the 1994–95 funding level for the assessor’s office was higher than the 1993–94 level, the 1993–94 fiscal year staffing and funding levels shall be considered the base year for purposes of this section. Commencing with the 1996–97 fiscal year, if a county was otherwise eligible but was unable to participate in this program in the 1995–96 fiscal year because it did not meet the funding level and staffing requirements of this paragraph, that county shall maintain a base staffing, including contract staff, and total funding level in the county assessor’s office equal to the levels in the 1995–96 fiscal year.

(2) Prior to the assessor’s recommendation for participation in the State-County Property Tax Administration Loan Program, the assessor shall consult with the county tax collector, and any other county agency directly involved in property tax administration, to discuss the needs of the program
 for the duration of the contractual agreement.

(d) A participating county may establish a tracking system whereby a work or function number is assigned to each appraisal or administrative activity. That system should provide statistical data on the number of production units performed by each employee and the positive and negative change in assessed value attributable to the activities performed by each employee.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 95.3, no amount of funds provided to an eligible county pursuant to this section shall result in any deduction from those property tax administrative costs that are eligible for reimbursement pursuant to Section 95.3.

(f) At the request of the Department of Finance, the board shall assist the Department of Finance in evaluating contracts entered into pursuant to this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 602, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

95.35.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that there is a significant and compelling state financial interest in the maintenance of an adequately funded system of property tax administration. This financial interest derives from the fact that 53 percent of all property tax revenues collected statewide serve to offset the General Fund obligation to fund K–12 schools, and extends not only to assessment and maintenance of the tax rolls, but also to all aspects of the system which include, but are not limited to, collection, apportionment,
 allocation, and processing and defending appeals. The Legislature further finds and declares that the combination of limitations on county revenue authority, increasing county financial obligations, and the shift of county property taxes to schools has created a financial disincentive for counties to adequately fund property tax administration. This disincentive is most clearly evidenced by the fact that counties, on average, receive 19 percent of statewide property tax revenues while they are obligated to pay an average of 73 percent of the costs of administration. The Legislature also finds and declares that the State-County Property Tax Loan Program contained in Section 95.31 was in recognition of the state’s financial interest, and the success of that program has demonstrated the appropriateness of an ongoing commitment of state funds to reduce the burden of property tax administration on county finances. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this act, to establish a grant program
 known as the State-County Property Tax Administration Grant Program that will continue the success of the State-County Property Tax Loan Program and maintain the commitment to efficient property tax administration.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in the 2002–03 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter to the 2006–07 fiscal year, inclusive, any county board of supervisors may, upon the recommendation of the assessor, adopt a resolution to elect to participate in the State-County Property Tax Administration Grant Program. Any resolution so adopted shall comply with the terms and conditions contained in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c). If adopted, a copy of the resolution shall be sent to the Department of Finance, which shall, upon approval, transmit a copy of the resolution to the Controller.

(c) (1) Any county electing to participate in